DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-75
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XL-01

DTC | c1243/43,c1245/45 | Malfunction in Deceleration Sensor

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

While vehicle speed becomes 0 km/h (0 mph) from 30 km/h
(18 mph), and the condition that GL1 and GL2 signals of ECU
terminals did not change 40 mV or less continued in a
sequence 16 times.

C1243/43

¢ Deceleration sensor

At the vehicle speed of 30 km/h (18 mph) or more, and the «Wire harness for deceleration sensor system

condition that the difference between acceleration and decel-
C1245/ 45 eration values of computation from deceleration sensor and
vehicle speed becomes more than 0.35 G continues for 60
SEc. or more.

Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs in the deceleration sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and
prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1incaseofusingthehand -

heldtastenasnd ssattirom step 2in case of not using

1 Checkoutputvalue of the deceleration sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthatthe deceleration value of the deceleration sensor displayed onthe hand -heldtesteris changing
when tilting the vehicle.
OK:
Deceleration value must be changing.

0K> Check andreplace ABS & BA & TRC & VSCECU.

NG

2 [ Check deceleration sensor (See page DI-4).

NG> Replace deceleration sensor.
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3 [ Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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